bg-BG: Тип контейнер за спасителен сал: Контейнер за палубен монтаж; Твърд контейнер; Мек калъф; Друг
nb: Type redningsflåtebeholder: Dekksmontert beholder i stativ; Hard beholder; Bag / myk pakke; Annet
da: Beholdertype til redningsflåde: Dækmonteret container i stativ; Hård container; Bæretaske/blød pakke; Andet
zh-TW: 救生筏容器類型: 甲板支架安裝式救生筏筒; 硬式救生筏筒; 帆布袋/軟包; 其他
lt-LT: Gelbėjimosi plausto konteinerio tipas: Dėklas, tvirtinamas ant denio atramos; Kietas dėklas; Krepšys / minkšta pakuotė; Kita
ko: 구명뗏목 컨테이너 유형: 데크 크래들 장착형 캐니스터; 하드 캐니스터; 발리스/소프트 팩; 기타
fi: Pelastuslautan säiliön tyyppi: Kannen telineeseen asennettu kotelo; Kova kotelo; Laukku / pehmeä pakkaus; Muu
fr: Type de conditionnement du radeau de survie: Conteneur monté sur berceau de pont; Conteneur rigide; Valise/sac souple; Autre
el: Τύπος κοντέινερ σωσίβιας λέμβου: Κάνιστρο τοποθετημένο σε βάση καταστρώματος; Σκληρό κάνιστρο; Βαλιτσάκι/μαλακή συσκευασία; Άλλο
de: Typ des Rettungsinsel-Containers: Kanister für Deckshalterung; Hartschalencontainer; Tasche/Softpack; Sonstige
nl: Reddingsvlot containertype: Bus in deksteun gemonteerd; Harde container; Tas/zachte verpakking; Overige
tr: Can kurtarma salı konteyner tipi: Güverte kızağına monteli kutu; Sert kutu; Çanta/yumuşak paket; Diğer
pl: Typ kontenera na tratwę ratunkową: Pojemnik montowany na stelażu pokładowym; Sztywny pojemnik; Torba / miękki pokrowiec; Inne
zh-CN: 救生筏收纳类型: 甲板托架式存放筒; 硬质存放筒; 手提包/软包; 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta vsebnika za rešilni splav: Na palubo nameščen kontejner; Trdi kontejner; Torba/mehki paket; Drugo
ja: 救命いかだコンテナタイプ: デッキクレードルマウントキャニスター; ハードキャニスター; バリス/ソフトパック; その他
pt-PT: Tipo de contentor para bote salva-vidas: Contentor montado em suporte de convés; Contentor rígido; Saco de transporte/pacote flexível; Outro
it: Tipo di contenitore del canotto di salvataggio: Contenitore rigido montato su sella da ponte; Contenitore rigido; Sacca morbida; Altro
hr-HR: Splav za spašavanje tipa spremnik: Spremnik montiran na palubni nosač; Tvrdi spremnik; Torba / mekano pakiranje; Ostalo
en: Life raft container type: Deck cradle-mounted canister; Hard canister; Valise/soft pack; Other
hu: Mentőtutaj-tároló típusa: Fedélzeti tartóba szerelt tartály; Kemény tartály; Táska / puha falú csomag; Egyéb
es: Tipo de contenedor de la balsa salvavidas: Contenedor montado en soporte de cubierta; Contenedor rígido; Bolsa/paquete blando; Otro
ru: Тип контейнера спасательного плота: Контейнер на палубных креплениях; Жесткий контейнер; Сумка/мягкий чехол; Другое
vi: Loại thùng chứa bè cứu sinh: Hộp đựng gắn trên giá đỡ boong; Hộp đựng cứng; Túi xách/túi mềm; Khác
cs: Záchranný vor kontejnerového typu: Palubní kontejner v kolébce; Pevný kontejner; Textilní taška / měkký obal; Jiné
sk-SK: Typ kontajnera pre záchranný čln: Kanister montovaný na palubnú kolísku; Pevný kanister; Taška/mäkký obal; Iné
sv: Livflotte – förvaringstyp: Däckmonterad behållare; Hård behållare; Väska/mjuk packning; Övrigt
pt-BR: Bote salva-vidas recipiente tipo: Cilindro montado em suporte de convés; Cilindro rígido; Valise/pacote flexível; Outro
th: ประเภทของภาชนะสำหรับแพชูชีพ: ถังแบบติดตั้งบนแท่นรองบนดาดฟ้าเรือ; ถังแข็ง; กระเป๋า/แพ็คแบบอ่อน; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Tip de container pentru pluta de salvare: Recipient montat pe suportul punții; Recipient rigid; Geantă / Pachet moale; Altele